Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.340

Federal funds for management and protection of forests, forest and range lands.

The department is authorized to receive funds from the federal government for cooperative work in management and protection of forests and forest and range lands as may be authorized by any act of Congress which is now, or may hereafter be, adopted for such purposes.

[ 2003 c 334 s 202; 1988 c 128 s 13; 1957 c 78 s 1. Formerly RCW 76.01.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.